nlp-tools/dict/ne_NP.aff
FLAG num
SFX 43 Y 369
SFX 43 0 सक्दिनथि [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिँदा [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिँदै [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिइँन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिइएला [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिइछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिइछन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिइछस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिइन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिइनन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिइनस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिइनेछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिइनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिइन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिइस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिइ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिए [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिएँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिएका [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिएको [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिएछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिएछन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिएछौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिएछौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिएन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिएनन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिएनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिएनौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिएर [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिएस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिनु [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिनुभयो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिनुहुन्छ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिनुहुन्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिने [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिनेछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिनेछन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिनेछस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिनेछु [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिनेछौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिनेछौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिनेबारे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिन्छ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिन्छन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिन्छस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिन्छिन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिन्छु [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिन्छे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिन्छेस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिन्छौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिन्छौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिन्छ्यौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिन्थिन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिन्थिस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिन्थि [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिन्थे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिन्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिन्थ्यौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिन्थ्यौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दियो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दियौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दियौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 देओस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिउन्जेल [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिइन्जेल [िइ]
SFX 43 0 देला [िइ]
SFX 43 0 नछिन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 नुपर्दछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 नुहुँदैन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहँदा [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहँदिनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहँदि [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहँदैन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहँदैनथे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहँदैनथ्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहँदैनन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहँदैनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहँदैनौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहँदो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहँदिनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहँदैन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहँदिनथि [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहँदैनथे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहँदैनथ्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहँदैनन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहँदैनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहँदैनौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहनु [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहनुभए [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहनुभएको [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहनुभयो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहनुहुन्छ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहनुहुन्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहने [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहनेछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहनेछन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहनेछस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहनेछु [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहनेछौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहनेछौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहनेबारे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहन्छ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहन्छन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहन्छस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहन्छिन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहन्छु [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहन्छौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहन्थिन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहन्थिस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहन्थि [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहन्थे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहन्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहन्थ्यौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहन्थ्यौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहला [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहिँन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहिएला [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहिन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहिनन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहिनस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहिनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहिन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहि [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहेका [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहेको [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहेछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहेछन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहेछौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहेछौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहेन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहेनन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहेनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहेनौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहेर [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहेस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहोस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रह्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रह्यौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रह्यौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राखिँन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राखिएछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राखिनन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राखिनस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राखिनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राखिन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राखिन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राखिस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राखि [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राखे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राखेका [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राखेको [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राखेन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राखेनन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राखेनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राखेनौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राखोस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्छ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्छन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्छस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्छिन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्छु [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्छेस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्छौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्छौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्थिन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्थिस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्थि [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्थे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्थ्यौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्थ्यौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्दछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्दिनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्दैन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्दिनथि [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्दैनथे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्दैनथ्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्दैनन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्दैनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्दैनौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्न [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्नु [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्नुभयो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्नुहुन्छ [िइ] 
SFX 43 0 राख्नुहुन्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्ने [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्नेछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्नेछन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्नेछस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्नेछु [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्नेछौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्नेछौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्यौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 राख्यौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकिँन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकिएछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकिएला [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकिछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकिछन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकिछस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकिन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकिनन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकिनस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकिनेछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकिनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकिन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकिन्जेल [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकिस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकिहालिएछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकिहालेछौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकि [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकुन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकुन्जेल [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सके [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकेका [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकेको [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकेछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकेछन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकेछौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकेछौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकेन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकेनन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकेनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकेनौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकेर [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सकोस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्छन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्छस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्छिन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्छु [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्छे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्छेस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्छौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्छौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्छ्यौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्थिन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्थिस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्थि [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्थे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्थ्यौ [िइ] 
SFX 43 0 सक्थ्यौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्दछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्दा [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्दिनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्दैछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्दैछु [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्दैछौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्दैन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्दैनथे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्दैनथ्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्दैनन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्दैनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्दैनौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्न [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्नु [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्नुभए [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्नुभएछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्नुभयो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्नुहुन्छ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्नुहुन्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्ने [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्नेछन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्नेछस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्नेछु [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्नेछौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्नेबारे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्यौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्यौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्ला [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालिएछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालिएला [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालिछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालिछन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालिछस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालिन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालिनन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालिनस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालिनेछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालिनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालिन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालिस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालि [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाले [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालेका [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालेको [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालेछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालेछन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालेछौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालेछौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालेन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालेनन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालेनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालेनौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालेर [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालेस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हालोस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्छ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्छन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्छस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्छिन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्छु [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्छे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्छेस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्छौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्छौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्छ्यौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्थिन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्थिस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्थि [िइ] 
SFX 43 0 हाल्थे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्थ्यौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्थ्यौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्दछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्दा [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्दिनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्दैन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्दैनथे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्दैनथ्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्दैनन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्दैनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्दैनौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्न [िइ] 
SFX 43 0 हाल्नु [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्नुभयो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्नुहुन्छ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्नुहुन्थ्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्ने [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्नेछ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्नेछन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्नेछस् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्नेछु [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्नेछौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्नेछौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्नेबारे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्यौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्यौँ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्ला [िइ]
SFX 43 0 हाल्दिनथि [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिदा [िइ]
SFX 43 0 दिदै [िइ]
SFX 43 0 नुहुदैन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहदा [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहदिनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहदि [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहदैन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहदैनथे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहदैनथ्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहदैनन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहदैनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहदैनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहदो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहदिनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहदैन [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहदिनथि [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहदैनथे [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहदैनथ्यो [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहदैनन् [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहदैनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 रहदैनौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्थ्यौ [िइ]
SFX 43 0 सक्दैछौ [िइ]
