nlp-tools/dict/ne_NP.dic
अक्रि/8,43
अघाइ/8,43
अड्काइ/8,43
अडेस्याइ/8,43
अथुलाइ/8,43
अमिल्याइ/8,43
अर्जापि/8,43
अरालि/8,43
अल्झाइ/8,43
अल्लारि/8,43
आँटि/8,43
इख्याइ/8,43
उँघि/8,43
उकालि/43
उकासि/8,43
उखालि/8,43
उगालि/43
उगेलि/8,43
उचालि/8,43
उछिनि/8,43
उजाडि/8,43
उझिन्ड्याइ/8,43
उड्काइ/8,43
उत्राइ/8,43
उध्राइ/8,43
उधिनि/8,43
उप्कि/8,43
उफारि/8,43
उबारि/8,43
उभाडि/8,43
उमर्कि/8,43
उम्टि/8,43
उम्रि/8,43
उमाइ/8,43
उमेठ्याइ/8,43
उरालि/8,43
उल्झाइ/8,43
उल्टि/8,43
एकसरि/8,43
ऐँठि/8,43
ओइलाइ/8,43
ओगटि/8,43
ओटि/8,43
ओथ्रि/8,43
ओर्लि/8,43
ओल्च्याइ/8,43
ओल्टि/8,43
ओसि/8,43
कँपाइ/8,43
कचल्टि/8,43
कज्याइ/8,43
कठाङ्ग्रि/8,43
कत्रि/8,43
कन्याइ/8,43
कप्याइ/8,43
करटाइ/8,43
कल्पि/8,43
काति/8,43
किनाइ/8,43
कुँढि/8,43
कुचुर्क्याइ/8,43
कुथुर्काइ/8,43
कुर्च्याइ/8,43
केस्र्याइ/8,43
कोचारि/8,43
कोप्‌र्याइ/8,43
खँदारि/8,43
खत्ति/8,43
खपाइ/8,43
खरि/8,43
खहरि/8,43
खारि/8,43
खिपि/8,43
खुटि/8,43
खुम्रि/8,43
खुवाइ/8,43
खेलाइ/8,43
खोच्याइ/8,43
खोदाइ/8,43
खोसल्टि/8,43
खोसेल्टि/8,43
गँथ्याइ/8,43
गडगडि/8,43
गप्फ्याइ/8,43
गलाइ/8,43
गिँडि/8,43
गुँडुल्कि/8,43
गुटमुट्याइ/8,43
गुताइ/8,43
गुमि/8,43
गोब्य्राइ/8,43
घन्कि/8,43
घस्टाइ/8,43
घहर्याइ/8,43
घिस्‌र्याइ/8,43
घुँगुरि/8,43
घुम्रि/8,43
घुस्रि/8,43
घोचाइ/8,43
घोपि/8,43
ङिस्याइ/8,43
चप्काइ/8,43
चरि/8,43
च्याति/8,43
चाहि/8,43
चिथरि/8,43
चिम्ट्याइ/8,43
चिर्सि/8,43
चिहिरि/8,43
चुकि/8,43
चुनि/8,43
चुमुर्कि/8,43
चुसाइ/8,43
चेपाइ/8,43
चोथि/8,43
चोराइ/8,43
छकि/8,43
छदाइ/8,43
छर्कि/8,43
छहकाइ/8,43
छामि/8,43
छिचलाइ/8,43
छिन्कि/8,43
छिरलाइ/8,43
छिलि/8,43
छुवाइ/8,43
छेराइ/8,43
छोलाइ/8,43
जगाइ/8,43
जम्कि/8,43
जलि/8,43
जिति/8,43
जिस्कि/8,43
जुठि/8,43
जोडाइ/8,43
झँकाइ/8,43
झड्कारि/8,43
झपारि/8,43
झराइ/8,43
झाँटि/8,43
झिजोलाइ/8,43
झुकाइ/8,43
झुप्याइ/8,43
झुलाइ/8,43
झोरि/8,43
टकटक्याइ/8,43
टन्कि/8,43
टल्काइ/8,43
टाँकि/8,43
टिठि/8,43
टुक्‌र्याइ/8,43
टुहुरि/8,43
टोकसि/8,43
ठङ्कारि/8,43
ठर्याइ/8,43
ठहराइ/8,43
ठिँगुरि/8,43
ठुस्कि/8,43
ठेसाइ/8,43
डँडाइ/8,43
डटि/8,43
डाँटि/8,43
डुक्रि/8,43
डोबाइ/8,43
ढकाइ/8,43
ढालि/8,43
ढोगाइ/8,43
तङ्ग्रि/8,43
तन्काइ/8,43
तम्सि/8,43
तरि/8,43
तापि/8,43
तुन्काइ/8,43
तुहाइ/8,43
तोकि/8,43
थच्काइ/8,43
थन्काइ/8,43
थल्याइ/8,43
थिग्‌र्याइ/8,43
थुनाइ/8,43
थुरि/8,43
दगल्च्याइ/8,43
दच्कि/8,43
दम्काइ/8,43
दहर्याइ/8,43
दि/8,43
दुहाइ/8,43
दोबारि/8,43
धड्काइ/8,43
धपेडि/8,43
धस्काइ/8,43
धिक्कारि/8,43
धुनि/8,43
धोत्‌र्याइ/8,43
नङ्याइ/8,43
नाचि/8,43
निकासि/8,43
निचोराइ/8,43
निदाइ/8,43
निफुल्कि/8,43
निम्ठि/8,43
निस्काइ/8,43
निहुरि/8,43
पक्डाइ/8,43
पगालि/43
पच्छि/8,43
पट्याइ/8,43
पडाइ/8,43
पथारि/8,43
परपरि/8,43
परि/8,43
पस्रि/8,43
पसारि/8,43
पहेँल्याइ/8,43
पादि/8,43
पिटाइ/8,43
पिल्सि/8,43
पुगि/8,43
पुल्कि/8,43
पेसाइ/8,43
पोतरि/8,43
पोसाइ/8,43
फच्चि/8,43
फतलि/8,43
फर्छ्याइ/8,43
फसि/8,43
फालि/8,43
फिसोलाइ/8,43
फुक्लि/8,43
फुत्कि/8,43
फुस्रि/8,43
फेटाइ/8,43
फोराइ/8,43
बखानि/8,43
बचि/8,43
बढाइ/8,43
बथानि/8,43
बम्कि/8,43
बरालाइ/8,43
बलि/8,43
ब्युँति/8,43
बाटुल्याइ/8,43
बिगबिगाइ/8,43
बिछाइ/8,43
बिथलि/8,43
बिरक्ति/8,43
बिल्झाइ/8,43
बुगुल्टि/8,43
बुडाइ/8,43
बेचाइ/8,43
बेसाइ/8,43
बोराइ/8,43
भँडाइ/8,43
भजि/8,43
भनाइ/8,43
भलि/8,43
भागि/8,43
भिरि/8,43
भुजाइ/8,43
भुलाइ/8,43
भेदि/8,43
मड्काइ/8,43
मथाइ/8,43
मनाइ/8,43
मलि/8,43
मागि/8,43
मिचि/8,43
मुकुर्याइ/8,43
मुडि/8,43
मुर्याइ/8,43
मेटाइ/8,43
मोसाइ/8,43
रँगेलि/8,43
रगेडि/8,43
रटाइ/8,43
रन्कि/8,43
रहि/8,43
रिँधि/8,43
रुँधि/8,43
रुमलाइ/8,43
रेलि/8,43
रोलि/8,43
लघारि/8,43
लट्काइ/8,43
लतराइ/8,43
लपेटि/8,43
लमि/8,43
लस्कि/8,43
लि/8,43
लुकाइ/8,43
लुडबुडि/8,43
लेच्याइ/8,43
लैजाइ/8,43
लोप्रि/8,43
वर्कि/8,43
सँगालि/8,43
सँभलाइ/8,43
सग्लाइ/8,43
सजाइ/8,43
सडि/8,43
सपाइ/8,43
सम्ल्हि/8,43
सर्कि/8,43
सहजि/8,43
साँधि/8,43
सिँचि/8,43
सिद्धि/8,43
सुइँठ्याइ/8,43
सुद्धि/8,43
सुनि/8,43
सुम्लि/8,43
सुल्याइ/8,43
हँकाइ/8,43
हडकि/8,43
हत्याइ/8,43
हर्कि/8,43
हस्काइ/8,43
हानाइ/8,43
हिल्याइ/15,22,8,43
हुच्चि/8,43
हेपि/8,43
हौसि/8,43
खसखसाइ/8,43
झकाइ/8,43
कहालि/8,43
पुर्याइ/8,43
चिताइ/8,43
आइ/8,43
लगाइ/8,43
उइटि/8,43
कुड्याइ/8,43
कुदि/8,43
खुडि/8,43
गाजि/8,43
घ्याकि/8,43
चुडालि/8,43
छिकि/8,43
झ्याकि/8,43
टगाइ/8,43
ठटाइ/8,43
डसाइ/8,43
ढुडि/8,43
पजाइ/8,43
पिदि/8,43
फाकि/8,43
फेकि/8,43
ब्युति/8,43
भगाल्याइ/8,43
रगेलाइ/8,43
रुगाइ/8,43
सगेटि/8,43
सभलि/8,43
सुइकाइ/8,43
हाकि/8,43
अकाइ/8,43
